Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 2. Firemen Pensions and Death Benefits

Cross references. —

For authority of board of public utilities in cities and towns to provide for a civil service status or a pension system, or both, for its employees, see §

15-7-404

.

As to retirement, see §§

9-3-401

through

9-3-432

.

As to volunteer firemen's pension account, see §§

35-9-601

through

35-9-615

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

60A Am. Jur. 2d Pensions and Retirement Funds §§ 1616, 1683 and 1684.

Disciplinary suspension of public employee as affecting computation of length of service for retirement or pension purposes, 6 ALR2d 506.

Cause or connection between firemen's performance of official duties and his disability for purposes of recovering disability benefits, 27 ALR2d 974.

Validity of legislation providing for additional retirement or disability allowances for firemen previously retired or disabled, 27 ALR2d 1442.

Validity or repeal of modification of pension statute provisions, 52 ALR2d 437.

Determination whether firefighter's disability is service-connected for disability pension purposes, 12 ALR4th 1158.

§ 15-5-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 41, § 3.

“Benefit unit” means each of the following:

Each paid fireman;

Each person receiving a monthly pension under W.S.

15-5-204

;

Each person receiving a disability pension under W.S.

15-5-204

;

Each account of a deceased or retired fireman from which monthly pension payments are being made to any person under W.S.

15-5-205

and

15-5-206

.

“Compensation Act” means the Wyoming Worker’s Compensation Act, W.S.

27-14-101

through

27-14-806

;

“Fireman first class” means the highest salary grade which a fireman can obtain within his department without any promotion in rank. The term specifically excludes chiefs, officers, engineers, fire equipment operators, secretaries, mechanics, inspectors and all other specialized grades, ratings and ranks;

and (vi) Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 41, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 3.

“Injured, disabled or killed in the line of duty” means that a paid or volunteer fireman is injured or disabled when he meets with bodily or mental injury while actually engaged in the repair, upkeep or care of fire apparatus, or in the performance of duties prescribed in the maintenance and operation of a fire department;

“Maximum monthly salary of a fireman first class” means the gross monthly salary of a fireman first class, including the greatest longevity or additional monthly salary increase for length of service, as established by the city, town or county which employed the retired, disabled or deceased paid fireman, and including contributions required by W.S.

15-5-203

;

“Minimum annual cash requirement of the account” means the amount of cash needed to meet the known required disbursements from the firemen’s pension account during the upcoming fiscal year, reduced by the anticipated cash account balance of the firemen’s pension account on hand at the end of the current fiscal year;

“Paid fireman” means an individual regularly employed and paid by any city, town, county or fire protection district for devoting his entire time of employment to the care, operation and requirements of a regularly constituted fire department;

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 41, § 3.

“Twenty years active service” means that an individual’s principal means of livelihood for twenty (20) years has been employment by one (1) or more cities, towns, counties or fire protection districts as a member of a regularly constituted fire department and that the individual has been carried on the payrolls thereof for that period of time;

“Volunteer fireman” means an individual who devotes less than his entire time of employment to, but who is carried on the rolls of a regularly constituted fire department, the members of which may be partly paid and partly volunteer. Payment of compensation for services actually rendered by enrolled volunteers does not take them out of this classification. Any individual who volunteers assistance but is not regularly enrolled as a fireman is not a volunteer within the meaning of this article;

“Board” means the retirement board created by W.S.

9-3-404

;

“Employer” means any incorporated municipality, county or fire protection district offering fire protection or public safety services employing one (1) or more members;

“Surviving spouse” shall not include any person who was first married to a paid fireman or retired fireman on or after April 1, 2022.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 303; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-303; Laws 1973, ch. 231, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 147, § 1; 2004, ch. 77, § 1; 2006, ch. 47, § 1; ch. 114, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (a)(ix), substituted “the greatest longevity” for “the fullest longevity,” deleted “Any increase or decrease of the maximum monthly salary of a fireman first class shall proportionately increase or decrease the first retirement, disability and death benefit pension payments made after the salary change is certified or proved to the state treasurer by the city, town or county. When so certified or proved, it shall, thereafter, only change the pension payments of paid firemen or former paid firemen of the department affected by the salary change” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 47, § 1, substituted “or public safety services employing one (1) or more members” for “service employing one (1) or more paid firemen members” in (a)(xvi).

Laws 2006, ch. 47, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2006.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, substituted “the fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30” for “a twelve (12) month period as defined by W.S. 9-7-303” in (a)(vii).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 114, both have been given effect as set out above.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, repealed former (a)(vii), pertaining to definition of “fiscal year.”

The 2012 amendment,

substituted “27-14-806” for “27-14-307” at the end of (a)(iii).

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, added (a)(xvii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Section 9-7-303, referred to in subsection (a)(vii), was repealed in 1980.

In light of the 1987 revision of title 27, the translation of the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act, referred to in subsection (a)(iii), is incorrect. See §§

27-14-101

and 27-14-102(a)(xxvi).

Legislative intent. —

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4, effective July 1, 2009, provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law. The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts. Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Prospective application. —

Laws 2001, ch. 36, § 3, provides: “The increase to the base benefit and the benefit payable to the surviving spouse and dependent parents provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2001, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2001.”

Laws 2000, ch. 42, § 2, effective July 1, 2000, provides: “The increase to the base benefit provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2000, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2000.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Savings clauses. —

Laws 2001, ch. 35, § 2, provides: “This act [which amended §

15-5-202

to prohibit dual participation in a paid and volunteer firemen's pension fund] shall not apply to any person who prior to the effective date of this act [February 16, 2001], participated in the firemen's pension system established under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

or

15-5-401

through

15-5-422

and pursuant to rule and regulation of the volunteer firemen's pension board, participated as a vested member of the volunteer firemen's pension fund under W.S.

35-9-601

through

35-9-615

.”

Someone in position of “permanent floor-watch duty” would be a “paid fireman.”

Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes “salary,” “wages,” “pay,” or the like, within pension law basing benefits thereon, 91 ALR5th 225.

§ 15-5-202.
Pension account; creation; administration; donations; investment; dual participation prohibited.

There is created a firemen’s pension account for the purpose of paying the awards, benefits and pensions under the provisions of this article. The account shall be administered by the board through the director. The board has full custody and control of the account with full power over its administration. The director of the state department of audit or his designee shall make a biennial audit of the account and the receipts thereto and disbursements therefrom and report his findings to the governor and the legislature. The account shall be administered without liability on the part of the state beyond the amount of the funds. All expenses of administration shall be paid from the account.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 69, § 2.

The board is empowered to:

Receive and credit to the account any and all gifts, donations and contributions as may be made by individuals and organizations for the benefit of the account;

Invest all account monies not immediately necessary for disbursements in any of the securities and in any amounts authorized by W.S.

9-3-408

.

No paid fireman shall participate as a member of the firemen’s pension account established under this article and as a member of the volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account established under W.S.

35-9-616

through

35-9-628

if participation is based upon covered service with the same fire department.

There is created the Fire A legislative reserve account. Funds in the account shall only be expended for the purposes of funding the shortfall in Fire A as identified in the legislative findings under W.S.

15-5-211

. Funds in the account shall be invested in the same manner as funds in the firemen’s pension account created by W.S.

15-5-202

and all investment earnings from the Fire A legislative reserve account shall be credited to the Fire A legislative reserve account. Funds in the account shall only be expended if funds in the firemen’s pension account are insufficient to provide benefits under this article. Funds in the Fire A legislative reserve account shall revert to the general fund once no person remains alive who is entitled to benefits under this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 304; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-304; Laws 1967, ch. 58, § 1; 1973, ch. 230, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2; 1986, ch. 77, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 189, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 2; 2001, ch. 35, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 83, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to deposit of gross tax levied upon fire insurance premiums, see §§ 26-4-102(b)(ii) and

35-9-604

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), in the first sentence deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” following “firemen's pension account”; and in (d), substituted “volunteer firemen's pension account” for “volunteer firemen's pension fund.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (a), deleted “and article 2 of this chapter” after “in this article,” added “director of the state department of audit,” and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “Effective July 1, 1981 the firemen's contingency account is abolished and all monies in that account as of that date shall be credited to the firemen's pension account.”

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (d), substituted “volunteer firefighter and EMT pension account established under
W.S.

35-9-616

through

35-9-628

” for “volunteer firemen's pension account established under
W.S.

35-9-601

through

35-9-615

.”

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in (d), substituted "volunteer firefighter, EMT and search and rescue pension account" for "volunteer firefighter and EMT pension account."

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, added (e).

Editor's notes. —

The first sentence in subsection (a) is set out as it appears in the printed acts.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2001, ch. 35, § 2, provides: “This act shall not apply to any person who prior to the effective date of this act, participated in the firemen's pension system established under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

or

15-5-401

through

15-5-422

and pursuant to rule and regulation of the volunteer firemen's pension board, participated as a vested member of the volunteer firemen's pension fund under W.S.

35-9-601

through

35-9-615

.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Applied

in

Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Casper, 551 P.2d 687,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1976).

Stated

in

Firemen's Pension Fund v. Hoy, 516 P.2d 365,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1973).

Cited

in

Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973); Gardner v. Nation, 522 P.2d 1281,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 210

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 15-5-203.
Firemen and employer contributions; imposition at discretion of board; amounts; how and when collected, suspended and reinstated.

In addition to the amount appropriated to the firemen’s pension account by W.S.

15-5-202

, every paid fireman may, at the discretion of the board, be assessed not more than eight percent (8%) of his gross monthly salary for the use and benefit of the account, up to the maximum monthly salary of a fireman first class. Any salary assessment imposed under this subsection shall be withheld monthly from his salary by the treasurer or other disbursing officer of the city, town or county.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 41, § 3.

Upon a determination by the board in accordance with subsection (g) of this section, every employer shall pay into the account for each paid fireman it employs an amount not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) of the salary of a fireman first class. Any contributions imposed under this subsection, together with the paid firemen’s contributions, shall be transferred and credited to the account in a manner as the board directs. If the contributions are not transferred to the board when due, they may be recovered, together with interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum in an action brought for that purpose in the district court for the county in which the employer has its principal office.

The contributions required by subsection (a) of this section shall be paid by the employer for paid firemen covered under this article in order to be treated as employer contributions for the sole purpose of determining tax treatment under the United States internal revenue code.

The contributions under subsection (e) of this section shall be paid from the source of funds which is used in paying salary to paid firemen covered under this article. The employer may pay these contributions by a reduction in cash salary of the paid firemen or by an offset against a future salary increase, or by a combination of a reduction in salary and an offset against a future salary increase, provided:

No such salary reduction or offset, or combination thereof, shall exceed the percentage amount actually being deducted from an employee’s salary for contributions to the firemen’s pension account as of July 1, 1983; and

Any employer may pay any amount of an employee’s share of retirement contributions without a salary reduction or offset, or combination thereof.

Based upon findings and recommendations of the Wyoming retirement system actuary, the board shall determine if contributions under subsections (a) and (d) of this section are necessary for the continued payment of benefits under this article. Any contributions imposed by the board upon paid firemen and employers shall bear the ratio provided for the maximum contribution rates authorized under subsections (a) and (d) of this section. If contributions are reinstated at any time following suspension of contributions, the board shall provide notice of reinstated contributions to firemen and employers not less than six (6) months prior to the date of imposition.

In addition to any other contribution required or authorized by this section, on April 1, 2022 the board shall assess employers for contributions in a total amount of twenty million dollars ($20,000,000.00) in order to achieve a proper actuarial funding level for the firemen’s pension account in accordance with the legislative findings under W.S

15-5-211

. The total assessment under this subsection shall be paid proportionately by employers with payments allocated to each employer by the board based upon the number of retirees, surviving spouses or other dependents receiving benefits under this article from the firemen’s pension account as of April 1, 2022. The state treasurer shall provide a loan to each employer for the payment required under this subsection which amounts shall be credited to the Fire A legislative reserve account. Loans under this subsection shall be repaid without interest over a period of twenty (20) years in equal payments in the time and manner required by the state treasurer and shall be deposited in the legislative stabilization reserve account. If repayment is not paid to the state treasurer when due, the state treasurer shall make the delinquent payment as provided in W.S. 39-14-801(j) and 9-4-601(a)(xii). Any delinquency not satisfied by those withholdings may be recovered in an action authorized under subsection (d) of this section, together with interest on the amount recovered as provided therein.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 305; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-305; Laws 1967, ch. 58, § 2; ch. 115, § 5; 1973, ch. 231, § 1; ch. 245, § 3; 1975, ch. 144, § 1; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 147, § 1; 1996, ch. 6, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2010, ch. 69, § 203; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (e), deleted “From and after July 1, 1983” at the beginning.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, added (h).

Section does not violate state constitution

(art. 1, § 34, Wyo. Const.) — Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Payment required by section is not a tax

within the meaning of art. 1, § 28, Wyo. Const.Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Or if it is, it is constitutionally applied

equally and uniformly. Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Rawlins, 510 P.2d 301,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1973).

Applied

in

Wyoming State Treas. v. City of Casper, 551 P.2d 687,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 1976); Atkinson v. Wittler, 647 P.2d 72,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 15-5-204.
Pensions; amounts; qualifications; when paid; disability benefits; disqualifications; examinations; disallowance; actions; adjustment.

Any person qualifying may retire from active service and receive a monthly pension of seventy-five percent (75%) of the maximum monthly salary of a fireman first class. Any benefit increases which may occur shall not subsequently be withdrawn. This benefit accrues to any paid fireman who has completed twenty (20) years of active service in regularly constituted fire departments of any cities, towns, counties or fire protection districts and to any paid fireman suffering from a mental or physical disability rendering him unfit for active duty. Any paid fireman covered under this article may continue service beyond twenty (20) years and receive an additional benefit of one and one-half percent (1.5%) of the maximum salary of a fireman first class for each year of service beyond twenty (20) years.

Any fireman with less than ten (10) years of service upon terminating his employment for any reason shall receive in a lump sum a refund of all the money he has contributed to the firemen’s pension account. Refund of such contributions extinguishes all rights to any benefits under this article.

After ten (10) years as a full time paid fireman, any fireman upon terminating his employment for any reason may have his choice of:

A refund, in a lump sum, of all the money he has contributed into the firemen’s pension account, less one-half percent (1/2%) for bookkeeping costs; or

Upon the twentieth anniversary of the date of his employment as a full time paid fireman he may draw a monthly pension computed as follows:

Number of years service x 75% of the maximummonthly salary of a fireman first class 20

Click to view

No fireman is entitled to draw a disability pension if the primary cause of the mental or physical disability which renders him unfit for active duty is alcoholism, substance abuse or addiction or an injury incurred as a result of the commission of a crime of a voluntary nature, or a mental or physical condition which existed at the time of his employment.

The board may require firemen applying for or drawing a disability pension to submit periodically to a physical or mental examination by a physician it selects and to furnish relevant information it requests. If the physician’s report, or other evidence available to the board, shows that the fireman is not qualified for the disability pension, or that he is fit for active duty, the board shall disallow or discontinue the payment of the monthly disability pension. Examining physicians selected by the board shall be paid from the account in accordance with existing worker’s compensation schedules for examinations.

Any applicant or beneficiary of the firemen’s pension account aggrieved by a disallowance or discontinuance of pension benefits has a right to commence an action in the district court of the county in which the applicant resides, naming the board, as custodian of the firemen’s pension account, as the party defendant, to have his rights to pension benefits determined before a judge of the district court.

Any pension benefit, survivor benefit or disability benefit received by an eligible individual under this article, and the fireman for whom the benefit is generated has been retired for a period of not less than one (1) year, shall not be increased after April 1, 2022.

The board shall adopt rules to allow service for any period of time, after commencement of participation under this article, which an employee spends in active military or other emergency service of the United States as required by the Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 306; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-306; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2; 1991, ch. 137, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2000, ch. 42, § 1; 2001, ch. 36, § 1; 2004, ch. 77, § 1; 2005, ch. 123, § 1; 2010, ch. 58, § 1; 2022 ch. 8, § 2, effective April 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to administration of firemen's pension account, see § 15-5-202(a).

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (g).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (d), substituted “substance abuse or” for “dope”; and deleted the former final sentence, which read: “Firemen employed in violation of the maximum age requirement specified in W.S.

15-5-107

are not qualified to receive a disability pension.”

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added (h).

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 1, 2022, in (g), added “not” following “shall” and substituted “after April 1, 2022” for “each year by at least three percent (3%). In the event the most current actuarial valuation indicates the market value of assets is greater than one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the actuarial value of liabilities, the board may increase the benefit by an amount determined affordable by the actuary, but in no case shall the total increase be greater than five percent (5%) of the benefit. Any increase under this subsection shall be added to the pension benefit, survivor benefit or disability benefit and compounded for purposes of determining the total benefit amount in subsequent years.”

Prospective application. —

Laws 2000, ch. 42, § 2, provides: “The increase to the base benefit provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2000, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2000.”

Laws 2001, ch. 36, § 3, provides: “The increase to the base benefit and the benefit payable to the surviving spouse and dependent parents provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2001, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2001.”

Failure to refund certain contributions not unconstitutional. —

The failure of this section before the 1981 amendment to provide for the refund of compulsory contributions to the firemen's pension account by former firemen who had served in that capacity for less than five years was not a taking of their private property for public or private use without just compensation in violation of art. 1, § 33, Wyo. Const.Atkinson v. Wittler, 647 P.2d 72,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1982).

Wyoming pension laws are not designed to be harsh

or work any hardship on a disabled fireman. Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

“Paid fireman” fit for “active duty” should be denied a disability pension.

Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

Someone in position of “permanent floor-watch duty” would be a “paid fireman.”

Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

“Floor-watch duty” is “active duty”

as a matter of law. Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

Hence, disabled fireman able to perform floor-watch duty denied pension. —

The denial of a disability pension was mandatory pursuant to subsection (d), if a disabled fireman was able to perform “floor-watch duty.” Hoy v. Firemen's Pension Fund, 540 P.2d 531,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1975).

Right to bring action. —

Subsection (f) is clear in its provision that an applicant of the firemen's pension fund (now account) aggrieved by a disallowance of pension benefits might bring an action in the district court to have the right to pension benefits determined, which procedure not being inconsistent with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act is in addition and supplementary thereto. Firemen's Pension Fund v. Hoy, 516 P.2d 365,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 195

(Wyo. 1973).

§ 15-5-205.
Death benefits to surviving spouse; amounts; limitations; length of payments.

If any paid fireman dies from any cause, the board shall pay to the surviving spouse a monthly pension equal to the greater of the monthly benefit payable to the fireman under W.S.

15-5-204

or the monthly benefit payable under W.S.

15-5-204

(a) for twenty (20) years of active service. Benefits payable under this subsection shall be paid out of the firemen’s pension account and shall continue for the spouse’s life.

If the fireman is a retired fireman drawing his pension at the time of his death, the board shall pay to the surviving spouse a monthly pension equal to the monthly benefit payable to the fireman under W.S.

15-5-204

. Benefits payable under this subsection shall be paid out of the firemen’s pension account and shall continue for the spouse’s life.

Repealed by Laws 2001, ch. 36, § 2.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 307; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-307; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2; 1987, ch. 35, § 1; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2001, ch. 36, §§ 1, 2.

Resumption of discontinued payments. —

Laws 1987, ch. 35, § 2, provides: “If the benefit payments to any surviving spouse were discontinued under W.S.

9-3-613

,

9-3-614

,

15-5-205

or

15-5-412

at any time because the surviving spouse remarried, those benefit payments shall be resumed in an amount to which the surviving spouse is entitled as provided by the appropriate statute authorizing surviving spouse benefit payments. Payments shall be resumed as of the month immediately following the month in which this act is effective.”

Prospective application. —

Laws 2001, ch. 36, § 3, provides: “The increase to the base benefit and the benefit payable to the surviving spouse and dependent parents provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2001, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2001.”

§ 15-5-206.
Death benefits to dependent father and mother; amounts.

If any paid fireman dies, leaving no surviving spouse or children, but leaves a surviving dependent father or mother or both, the board shall pay to the mother if there is no father, to the father if there is no mother or to both, out of the firemen’s pension account, a monthly amount equal to the pension the retired fireman was receiving if retired at the time of his death, or if in active service at the time of death, a monthly amount equal to the greater of the monthly benefit payable to the fireman under W.S.

15-2-204

at the time of his death or the monthly benefit payable under W.S.

15-2-204

(a) for twenty (20) years of active service. If either the surviving mother or father dies after the payments have started, the board shall pay to the surviving parent the full amount as computed under this section.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 308; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-308; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2; 1997, ch. 69, § 1; 2001, ch. 36, § 1.

Prospective application. —

Laws 2001, ch. 36, § 3, provides: “The increase to the base benefit and the benefit payable to the surviving spouse and dependent parents provided under section 1 of this act shall apply to all benefits payable under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

on or after July 1, 2001, and shall not apply to benefit payments made under W.S.

15-5-201

through

15-5-209

prior to July 1, 2001.”

§ 15-5-207.
Application for benefits; statement filed; determination; review; appeal.

If any fireman, his surviving spouse, dependent children or dependent parents are entitled to any pension or benefits under this article, the fireman, or in the event of his death, the chief of the fire department of which he was a member, or some other proper person, shall apply by filing a complete and concise statement of the facts necessary to entitle the fireman or the fireman’s surviving spouse or children or parents to the benefits or pension. The application shall be filed with the board upon forms it provides. The board is empowered to investigate the application and determine whether or not it should be granted and to hear evidence as to the justice of the application, or to require and receive affidavits as to the truth of the statements made in the application. If the application is refused, the matter may be taken, by petition, before the district court of the county in which the applicant resides. The court shall notify the board of the date set for hearing. The decision of the district court is binding upon the board and applicant unless appealed from according to the procedure provided under the Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.].

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 310; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-310; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2.

§ 15-5-208.
Pension application; payments thereafter; when benefits suspended.

Application for pension may be made prior to actual retirement upon statement of the intention to retire, but payment shall not begin until the applicant has actually retired and his name is stricken from the payroll of the city or town. No fireman or any of his survivors is entitled to any of the benefits of this article while the fireman or his survivors are receiving payments under the Worker’s Compensation Act [§

27-14-101

et seq.], but when the payments under the Worker’s Compensation Act terminate, his or their rights to the benefits of this article attach. Any fireman who is entitled to the benefits of insurance paid for from the general fund of any city or town is not entitled to any of the benefits of this article until the insurance payments cease.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 311; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-311; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to insurance generally, see title 26.

§ 15-5-209.
Payments; when and how made; protections; nonassignability; qualified domestic relations order.

Payments made under this article shall be made to the beneficiaries on or before the fifth day of each month and shall be made by voucher approved by the board or its designee drawn against the firemen’s pension account and paid by the board out of the account. No payments made under this article are subject to judgment, attachment, execution, garnishment or other legal process and are not assignable nor shall the board recognize any assignment nor pay over any sum assigned.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, payments under this article may be made in accordance with qualified domestic relations orders pursuant to W.S.

9-3-426

.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 312; W.S. 1957, § 15.1-312; Laws 1973, ch. 245, § 3; 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 41, § 2; 1993, ch. 149, § 1.

§ 15-5-210.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 6, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1981, ch. 41, § 1, related to funding by the state.